District of Columbia statutes.
1-308.05

Bond authorization.

The issuance of Bonds in accordance with this part is authorized. The aggregate principal amount of Bonds which may be issued under this part shall not exceed $500 million; provided, that the aggregate amount of Bonds that may be allocated to benefit directly projects in the Central Business District, as that term is defined in Chapter 17 of Title 11 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (11 DCMR § 1700 et seq.), shall not exceed $300 million.

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-293, § 6, 52 DCR 1465
Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-244, § 101, 54 DCR 609
D.C. Law 16-244 substituted “$500 million; provided, that the aggregate amount of Bonds that may be allocated to benefit directly projects in the Central Business District, as that term is defined in Chapter 17 of Title 11 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations ( 11 DCMR § 1700 et seq.), shall not exceed $300 million” for “$250 million”.